klpt/data/ckb-Arab.aff
PFX M 0 وەریاننا .
PFX M 0 وەریانمە .
PFX M 0 وەریاننە .
PFX M 0 وەریانب .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمدە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمئە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمنا .
PFX M 0 ڕۆممە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمنە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمب .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتدە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتئە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتنا .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتمە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتنە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتب .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیدە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیئە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆینا .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیمە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆینە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیب .
PFX M 0 ڕۆماندە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمانئە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆماننا .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمانمە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆماننە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆمانب .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتاندە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتانئە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتاننا .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتانمە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتاننە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆتانب .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیاندە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیانئە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیاننا .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیانمە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیاننە .
PFX M 0 ڕۆیانب .
PFX M 0 بەرمدە .
PFX M 0 بەرمئە .
PFX M 0 بەرمنا .
PFX M 0 بەرممە .
PFX M 0 بەرمنە .
PFX M 0 بەرمب .
PFX M 0 بەرتدە .
PFX M 0 بەرتئە .
PFX M 0 بەرتنا .
PFX M 0 بەرتمە .
PFX M 0 بەرتنە .
PFX M 0 بەرتب .
PFX M 0 بەریدە .
PFX M 0 بەریئە .
PFX M 0 بەرینا .
PFX M 0 بەریمە .
PFX M 0 بەرینە .
PFX M 0 بەریب .
PFX M 0 بەرماندە .
PFX M 0 بەرمانئە .
PFX M 0 بەرماننا .
PFX M 0 بەرمانمە .
PFX M 0 بەرماننە .
PFX M 0 بەرمانب .
PFX M 0 بەرتاندە .
PFX M 0 بەرتانئە .
PFX M 0 بەرتاننا .
PFX M 0 بەرتانمە .
PFX M 0 بەرتاننە .
PFX M 0 بەرتانب .
PFX M 0 بەریاندە .
PFX M 0 بەریانئە .
PFX M 0 بەریاننا .
PFX M 0 بەریانمە .
PFX M 0 بەریاننە .
PFX M 0 بەریانب .
PFX M 0 وێکمدە .
PFX M 0 وێکمئە .
PFX M 0 وێکمنا .
PFX M 0 وێکممە .
PFX M 0 وێکمنە .
PFX M 0 وێکمب .
PFX M 0 وێکتدە .
PFX M 0 وێکتئە .
PFX M 0 وێکتنا .
PFX M 0 وێکتمە .
PFX M 0 وێکتنە .
PFX M 0 وێکتب .
PFX M 0 وێکیدە .
PFX M 0 وێکیئە .
PFX M 0 وێکینا .
PFX M 0 وێکیمە .
PFX M 0 وێکینە .
PFX M 0 وێکیب .
PFX M 0 وێکماندە .
PFX M 0 وێکمانئە .
PFX M 0 وێکماننا .
PFX M 0 وێکمانمە .
PFX M 0 وێکماننە .
PFX M 0 وێکمانب .
PFX M 0 وێکتاندە .
PFX M 0 وێکتانئە .
PFX M 0 وێکتاننا .
PFX M 0 وێکتانمە .
PFX M 0 وێکتاننە .
PFX M 0 وێکتانب .
PFX M 0 وێکیاندە .
PFX M 0 وێکیانئە .
PFX M 0 وێکیاننا .
PFX M 0 وێکیانمە .
PFX M 0 وێکیاننە .
PFX M 0 وێکیانب .
PFX M 0 لێکمدە .
PFX M 0 لێکمئە .
PFX M 0 لێکمنا .
PFX M 0 لێکممە .
PFX M 0 لێکمنە .
PFX M 0 لێکمب .
PFX M 0 لێکتدە .
PFX M 0 لێکتئە .
PFX M 0 لێکتنا .
PFX M 0 لێکتمە .
PFX M 0 لێکتنە .
PFX M 0 لێکتب .
PFX M 0 لێکیدە .
PFX M 0 لێکیئە .
PFX M 0 لێکینا .
PFX M 0 لێکیمە .
PFX M 0 لێکینە .
PFX M 0 لێکیب .
PFX M 0 لێکماندە .
PFX M 0 لێکمانئە .
PFX M 0 لێکماننا .
PFX M 0 لێکمانمە .
PFX M 0 لێکماننە .
PFX M 0 لێکمانب .
PFX M 0 لێکتاندە .
PFX M 0 لێکتانئە .
PFX M 0 لێکتاننا .
PFX M 0 لێکتانمە .
PFX M 0 لێکتاننە .
PFX M 0 لێکتانب .
PFX M 0 لێکیاندە .
PFX M 0 لێکیانئە .
PFX M 0 لێکیاننا .
PFX M 0 لێکیانمە .
PFX M 0 لێکیاننە .
PFX M 0 لێکیانب .
PFX M 0 دەش . 
PFX M 0 ئەش . 
PFX M 0 ناش . 
PFX M 0 مەش . 
PFX M 0 نەش . 
PFX M 0 بش . 
PFX M 0 دەشم . 
PFX M 0 دەشت . 
PFX M 0 دەشی . 
PFX M 0 دەشمان . 
PFX M 0 دەشتان . 
PFX M 0 دەشیان . 
PFX M 0 ئەشم . 
PFX M 0 ئەشت . 
PFX M 0 ئەشی . 
PFX M 0 ئەشمان . 
PFX M 0 ئەشتان . 
PFX M 0 ئەشیان . 
PFX M 0 ناشم . 
PFX M 0 ناشت . 
PFX M 0 ناشی . 
PFX M 0 ناشمان . 
PFX M 0 ناشتان . 
PFX M 0 ناشیان . 
PFX M 0 مەشم . 
PFX M 0 مەشت . 
PFX M 0 مەشی . 
PFX M 0 مەشمان . 
PFX M 0 مەشتان . 
PFX M 0 مەشیان . 
PFX M 0 نەشم . 
PFX M 0 نەشت . 
PFX M 0 نەشی . 
PFX M 0 نەشمان . 
PFX M 0 نەشتان . 
PFX M 0 نەشیان . 
PFX M 0 بشم . 
PFX M 0 بشت . 
PFX M 0 بشی . 
PFX M 0 بشمان . 
PFX M 0 بشتان . 
PFX M 0 بشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێشم . 
PFX M 0 پێشت . 
PFX M 0 پێشی . 
PFX M 0 پێشمان . 
PFX M 0 پێشتان . 
PFX M 0 پێشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێشم . 
PFX M 0 پێشت . 
PFX M 0 پێشی . 
PFX M 0 پێشمان . 
PFX M 0 پێشتان . 
PFX M 0 پێشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێشم . 
PFX M 0 پێشت . 
PFX M 0 پێشی . 
PFX M 0 پێشمان . 
PFX M 0 پێشتان . 
PFX M 0 پێشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێشم . 
PFX M 0 پێشت . 
PFX M 0 پێشی . 
PFX M 0 پێشمان . 
PFX M 0 پێشتان . 
PFX M 0 پێشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێشم . 
PFX M 0 پێشت . 
PFX M 0 پێشی . 
PFX M 0 پێشمان . 
PFX M 0 پێشتان . 
PFX M 0 پێشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێشم . 
PFX M 0 پێشت . 
PFX M 0 پێشی . 
PFX M 0 پێشمان . 
PFX M 0 پێشتان . 
PFX M 0 پێشیان . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمدە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتدە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیدە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشماندە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمئە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتئە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیئە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمنا . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتنا . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشینا . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشماننا . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشممە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتمە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیمە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمنە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتنە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشینە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشماننە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتاننە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیاننە . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمب . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتب . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیب . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشمانب . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشتانب . 
PFX M 0 پێکیشیانب . 
PFX M 0 تێشم . 
PFX M 0 تێشت . 
PFX M 0 تێشی . 
PFX M 0 تێشمان . 
PFX M 0 تێشتان . 
PFX M 0 تێشیان . 
PFX M 0 تێشم . 
PFX M 0 تێشت . 
PFX M 0 تێشی . 
PFX M 0 تێشمان . 
PFX M 0 تێشتان . 
PFX M 0 تێشیان . 
PFX M 0 تێشم . 
PFX M 0 تێشت . 
PFX M 0 تێشی . 
PFX M 0 تێشمان . 
PFX M 0 تێشتان . 
PFX M 0 تێشیان . 
PFX M 0 تێشم . 
PFX M 0 تێشت . 
PFX M 0 تێشی . 
PFX M 0 تێشمان . 
PFX M 0 تێشتان . 
PFX M 0 تێشیان . 
PFX M 0 تێشم . 
PFX M 0 تێشت . 
PFX M 0 تێشی . 
PFX M 0 تێشمان . 
PFX M 0 تێشتان . 
PFX M 0 تێشیان . 
PFX M 0 تێشم . 
PFX M 0 تێشت . 
PFX M 0 تێشی . 
PFX M 0 تێشمان . 
PFX M 0 تێشتان . 
PFX M 0 تێشیان . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمدە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتدە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیدە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشماندە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمئە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتئە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیئە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمنا . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتنا . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشینا . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشماننا . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشممە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتمە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیمە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمنە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتنە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشینە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشماننە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتاننە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیاننە . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمب . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتب . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیب . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشمانب . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشتانب . 
PFX M 0 تێکیشیانب . 
PFX M 0 داشم . 
PFX M 0 داشت . 
PFX M 0 داشی . 
PFX M 0 داشمان . 
PFX M 0 داشتان . 
PFX M 0 داشیان . 
PFX M 0 داشم . 
PFX M 0 داشت . 
PFX M 0 داشی . 
PFX M 0 داشمان . 
PFX M 0 داشتان . 
PFX M 0 داشیان . 
PFX M 0 داشم . 
PFX M 0 داشت . 
PFX M 0 داشی . 
PFX M 0 داشمان . 
PFX M 0 داشتان . 
PFX M 0 داشیان . 
PFX M 0 داشم . 
PFX M 0 داشت . 
PFX M 0 داشی . 
PFX M 0 داشمان . 
PFX M 0 داشتان . 
PFX M 0 داشیان . 
PFX M 0 داشم . 
PFX M 0 داشت . 
PFX M 0 داشی . 
PFX M 0 داشمان . 
PFX M 0 داشتان . 
PFX M 0 داشیان . 
PFX M 0 داشم . 
PFX M 0 داشت . 
PFX M 0 داشی . 
PFX M 0 داشمان . 
PFX M 0 داشتان . 
PFX M 0 داشیان . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمدە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتدە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیدە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشماندە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمئە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتئە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیئە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمنا . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتنا . 
PFX M 0 دەریشینا . 
PFX M 0 دەریشماننا . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 دەریشممە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتمە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیمە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمنە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتنە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشینە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشماننە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتاننە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیاننە . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمب . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتب . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیب . 
PFX M 0 دەریشمانب . 
PFX M 0 دەریشتانب . 
PFX M 0 دەریشیانب . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشم . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشت . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشی . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشمان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشتان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشیان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشم . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشت . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشی . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشمان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشتان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشیان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشم . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشت . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشی . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشمان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشتان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشیان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشم . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشت . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشی . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشمان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشتان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشیان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشم . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشت . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشی . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشمان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشتان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشیان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشم . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشت . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشی . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشمان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشتان . 
PFX M 0 ڕاشیان . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمدە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتدە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیدە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشماندە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمئە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتئە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیئە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمنا . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتنا . 
PFX M 0 سەریشینا . 
PFX M 0 سەریشماننا . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 سەریشممە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتمە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیمە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمنە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتنە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشینە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشماننە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتاننە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیاننە . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمب . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتب . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیب . 
PFX M 0 سەریشمانب . 
PFX M 0 سەریشتانب . 
PFX M 0 سەریشیانب . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمدە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتدە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیدە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشماندە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمئە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتئە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیئە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمنا . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتنا . 
PFX M 0 بەریشینا . 
PFX M 0 بەریشماننا . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 بەریشممە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتمە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیمە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمنە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتنە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشینە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشماننە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتاننە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیاننە . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمب . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتب . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیب . 
PFX M 0 بەریشمانب . 
PFX M 0 بەریشتانب . 
PFX M 0 بەریشیانب . 
PFX M 0 لێشم . 
PFX M 0 لێشت . 
PFX M 0 لێشی . 
PFX M 0 لێشمان . 
PFX M 0 لێشتان . 
PFX M 0 لێشیان . 
PFX M 0 لێشم . 
PFX M 0 لێشت . 
PFX M 0 لێشی . 
PFX M 0 لێشمان . 
PFX M 0 لێشتان . 
PFX M 0 لێشیان . 
PFX M 0 لێشم . 
PFX M 0 لێشت . 
PFX M 0 لێشی . 
PFX M 0 لێشمان . 
PFX M 0 لێشتان . 
PFX M 0 لێشیان . 
PFX M 0 لێشم . 
PFX M 0 لێشت . 
PFX M 0 لێشی . 
PFX M 0 لێشمان . 
PFX M 0 لێشتان . 
PFX M 0 لێشیان . 
PFX M 0 لێشم . 
PFX M 0 لێشت . 
PFX M 0 لێشی . 
PFX M 0 لێشمان . 
PFX M 0 لێشتان . 
PFX M 0 لێشیان . 
PFX M 0 لێشم . 
PFX M 0 لێشت . 
PFX M 0 لێشی . 
PFX M 0 لێشمان . 
PFX M 0 لێشتان . 
PFX M 0 لێشیان . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمدە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتدە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیدە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشماندە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمئە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتئە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیئە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمنا . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتنا . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشینا . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشماننا . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشممە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتمە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیمە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمنە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتنە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشینە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشماننە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتاننە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیاننە . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمب . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتب . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیب . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشمانب . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشتانب . 
PFX M 0 هەڵیشیانب . 
PFX M 0 وێشم . 
PFX M 0 وێشت . 
PFX M 0 وێشی . 
PFX M 0 وێشمان . 
PFX M 0 وێشتان . 
PFX M 0 وێشیان . 
PFX M 0 وێشم . 
PFX M 0 وێشت . 
PFX M 0 وێشی . 
PFX M 0 وێشمان . 
PFX M 0 وێشتان . 
PFX M 0 وێشیان . 
PFX M 0 وێشم . 
PFX M 0 وێشت . 
PFX M 0 وێشی . 
PFX M 0 وێشمان . 
PFX M 0 وێشتان . 
PFX M 0 وێشیان . 
PFX M 0 وێشم . 
PFX M 0 وێشت . 
PFX M 0 وێشی . 
PFX M 0 وێشمان . 
PFX M 0 وێشتان . 
PFX M 0 وێشیان . 
PFX M 0 وێشم . 
PFX M 0 وێشت . 
PFX M 0 وێشی . 
PFX M 0 وێشمان . 
PFX M 0 وێشتان . 
PFX M 0 وێشیان . 
PFX M 0 وێشم . 
PFX M 0 وێشت . 
PFX M 0 وێشی . 
PFX M 0 وێشمان . 
PFX M 0 وێشتان . 
PFX M 0 وێشیان . 
PFX M 0 وەریشمدە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتدە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیدە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشماندە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتاندە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیاندە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشمئە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتئە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیئە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشمانئە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتانئە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیانئە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشمنا . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتنا . 
PFX M 0 وەریشینا . 
PFX M 0 وەریشماننا . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتاننا . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیاننا . 
PFX M 0 وەریشممە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتمە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیمە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشمانمە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشتانمە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشیانمە . 
PFX M 0 وەریشمنە . 
